California statutes. Insurance Code
(5) The estimated value of all assets frozen, penalties assessed, and restitutions made for each conviction.

(6) Any additional items necessary to fully inform the Fraud Assessment Commission and the Legislature of the fraud-fighting efforts financed through this section.

(i) In order to meet the requirements of subdivision (g), the department shall submit a biannual information request to those district attorneys who have applied for and received funding through the annual assessment process under this section.

(j) Assessments levied or collected to fight workers’ compensation fraud and insurance fraud are not taxes. Those
 funds are entrusted to the state to fight fraud and the willful failure to secure the payment of workers’ compensation by funding state and local investigation and prosecution efforts. Accordingly, any funds resulting from assessments, fees, penalties, fines, restitution, or recovery of costs of investigation and prosecution deposited in the Insurance Fund shall not be deemed “unexpended” funds for any purpose and, if remaining in that account at the end of any fiscal year, shall be applied as provided in subdivision (f) and to offset or augment subsequent years’ program funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 23, Sec. 3.   (SB 129)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.84.

The commissioner shall ensure that the Fraud Division forwards to the appropriate disciplinary body, in addition to the names and supporting evidence of individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 1872.83, the names, along with all supporting evidence, of any individuals licensed under the Chiropractic Initiative Act who are suspected of actively engaging in fraudulent activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.85.

(a) Every admitted disability insurer or other entity liable for any loss due to health insurance fraud doing business in this state shall pay an annual special purpose assessment to be determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed twenty cents ($0.20) annually for each person in this state covered under an individual or group insurance policy regardless of the situs of the contract or master group policyholder, and regardless of whether the insured has been issued an individual certificate of coverage, and including blanket insurance as defined in Section 10270.2, in order to fund increased investigation and prosecution of fraudulent disability insurance claims. The data supporting the special purpose assessment shall not be required to be submitted more often than once each
 calendar year, except that responses to questions from the commissioner and clarifying information regarding the data shall not be considered as additional submissions of data. For group and blanket insurance contracts, insurers may rely on information requested from and provided by the group policyholder after a reasonable effort to obtain timely and accurate information. After incidental expenses, 30 percent of those funds received from the assessment per insured shall be distributed to the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance for enhanced investigative efforts, and 70 percent of the funds shall be distributed to local district attorneys, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), for investigation and prosecution of disability insurance fraud cases. The funds received pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Disability Insurance Fraud Account, which is hereby created in the Insurance Fund, and shall be expended and distributed, when appropriated by the Legislature, only for enhanced
 investigation and prosecution of disability insurance fraud.

In the course of its investigation, the Fraud Division shall aggressively pursue all reported incidents of probable fraud and, in addition, shall forward to the appropriate disciplinary body the names of any individuals licensed under the Business and Professions Code who are convicted of engaging in fraudulent activity along with all relevant supporting evidence.

(b) The commissioner shall distribute funds pursuant to subdivision (a) to district attorneys who are able to show a likely positive outcome that will enhance the prosecution of disability insurance fraud in their jurisdiction based on specific criteria promulgated by the commissioner. A district attorney desiring funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall submit to the commissioner an application that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The proposed use of the moneys and the anticipated outcome.

(2) A list of all prior cases or projects in the district attorney’s jurisdiction that have been funded under the provisions of this section, and a copy of the final accounting for each case or project. If a case or project is ongoing, the most recent accounting shall be provided.

(3) A detailed budget for the moneys, including salaries and general expenses, that specifically identifies the purchase or rental cost of equipment or supplies.

(c) (1) A district attorney who receives moneys pursuant to this section shall submit a final detailed accounting at the conclusion of each case or project funded. For a case or project that continues for longer than six months, an
 interim accounting shall be submitted every six months, or as otherwise directed by the commissioner.

(2) A district attorney who receives moneys pursuant to this section shall submit a final report to the commissioner, which may be made public, as to the success of each case or project funded by this section. The report shall provide information and statistics on the number of active investigations, arrests, indictments, and convictions associated with a case or project. The applications for moneys, the distribution of moneys, and the annual report required by Section 1872.9 shall be public documents.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, information submitted to the commissioner pursuant to this section concerning criminal investigations, whether active or inactive, shall be confidential.

(4) The
 commissioner may conduct a fiscal audit of the programs administered under this subdivision. The fiscal audit shall be conducted by an internal audit unit of the department. The cost of fiscal audits shall be paid from the Disability Insurance Fraud Account, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(5) If the commissioner determines that a district attorney is unable or unwilling to investigate or prosecute a relevant disability insurance fraud case, the commissioner may discontinue distribution of moneys allocated for that matter pursuant to this section, and may redistribute moneys to other eligible district attorneys.

(d) Activities of the Fraud Division with regard to investigating and prosecuting fraudulent disability insurance claims pursuant to this section shall be included in the report required by Section 1872.9.

(e) This section shall not apply to policies issued by a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, as defined by Sections 1303 and 1350, or coverage provided by or through a motor club, as defined by Section 12142, affiliated with a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, if the annual premium charged for the coverage or the annual cost to the insurer for providing that coverage does not exceed one dollar ($1) per insured.

(f) The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this section in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (SB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.86.

(a) An insurer doing business in this state shall pay an annual special purpose assessment to be determined by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand one hundred dollars ($5,100), to be used exclusively for the support of the Fraud Division. All moneys received by the commissioner from insurers pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Insurance Fund.

(b) The Fraud Division shall report annually, on the department’s Internet Web site, all of the following information:

(1) The number of suspected fraudulent claim referrals made to the Fraud Division pursuant to Section 1872.4, by line of insurance.

(2) The number of investigations opened by the Fraud Division, by line of insurance, at the local, state, and federal levels.

(3) The number of investigations referred by the Fraud Division for criminal prosecution, by line of insurance, at the local, state, and federal levels.

(4) The number of insurer fraud cases investigated by the department’s Enforcement Branch.

(5) The number of criminal complaints filed by prosecutors at the local, state, and federal levels.

(6) The number of convictions at the local, state, and federal levels.

(7) The total amount of court-ordered restitution, and the amount collected by the courts for the victims.

(8) The number of training presentations focusing on the current schemes and trends, investigative tools and techniques, and proper reporting requirements needed to increase the quality of suspected fraudulent referrals by insurance industry special investigation units.

(9) The number of vacant peace officer positions, including information on the number and rate of vacancies for which an employment commitment has been made and on the number and rate of vacancies required to meet budgeted salary savings requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.87.

(a) Each insurer required to pay special purpose assessments pursuant to Sections 1872.8, 1872.81, 1872.85, 1874.8, or subdivision (a) of Section 1872.86 may, over a reasonable length of time, but in no event later than the calendar year in which the assessment is paid, recoup the special purpose assessments by way of a surcharge on premiums charged for the insurance policies to which those sections apply or by including the assessments within the insurer’s rates. Amounts recouped shall not be considered premiums for any purpose, including the computation of gross premium tax or agents’ commission.

(b) The amount of the surcharge shall be separately stated on either a billing or
 policy declaration sent to an insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 22.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.9.

The Fraud Division shall annually compile and report, as a part of the commissioner’s annual report as required by Section 12922, the following information:

(a) The number of cases reported to the division pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The number of cases rejected for which an investigation was not initiated by the division due to insufficient evidence to proceed and the number of cases rejected for which an investigation was not initiated by the division due to any other reason.

(c) The number of cases that were prosecuted in cooperation with licensing agencies governed by the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The number and kind of cases prosecuted as a result of moneys received under Section 1872.7.

(e) An estimate of the economic value of insurance fraud by type of insurance fraud.

(f) Recommendations on ways insurance fraud may be reduced.

(g) A summary of the division’s activities with respect to pursuing a reduction of fraud with all of the following:

(1) Insurance companies.

(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(4) Licensing agencies governed by the Business and Professions Code.

(5) The Department of Insurance.

(6) Local and state law enforcement agencies.

(7) Employers, as defined in Section 3300 of the Labor Code, who are self-insured for workers’ compensation and doing business in the state.

(h) Basic claims information including trends of payments by type of claim and other claim information that is generally provided in a closed claim study.

(i) A summary of the division’s activities with respect to the reduction, pursuant to Section 1871.4, of fraudulent denials and payments of compensation.

(j) The number and types of cases investigated and prosecuted with funds specified in Section 1872.83.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 717, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.95.

(a) Within existing resources, the Medical Board of California, the Board of Chiropractic Examiners, and the State Bar shall each designate employees to investigate and report on possible fraudulent activities relating to workers’ compensation, motor vehicle insurance, or disability insurance by licensees of the board or the bar. Those employees shall actively cooperate with the Fraud Division in the investigation of those activities.

(b) The Medical Board of California and the Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall each report annually, on or before March 1, to the committees of the Senate and Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance on their activities established pursuant to subdivision (a) for the previous year. The
 State Bar shall include this report in its Annual Discipline Report on or before April 30. That report shall specify, at a minimum, the number of cases investigated, the number of cases forwarded to the Fraud Division or other law enforcement agencies, the outcome of all cases listed in the report, and any other relevant information concerning those cases or general activities conducted under subdivision (a) for the previous year. The report shall include information regarding activities conducted in connection with cases of suspected automobile insurance fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 149.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.96.

The commissioner shall prepare an annual report, which shall be a public record, with respect to the receipts, expenditures, and activities of the Fraud Division for the year just ended. The report shall be submitted to the Governor and to the Legislature, no later than January 31 of the following year. This report shall not contain any individually identifiable information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 717, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Insurance Fraud Reporting [1873. - 1873.4.]

1873.

(a) Upon written request to an insurer by officers designated in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.1 and subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, and subdivisions (a), (c), and (i) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code, an insurer, or agent authorized by that insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, shall release to the requesting authorized governmental agency any or all relevant information deemed important to the authorized governmental agency that the insurer may possess relating to any specific insurance fraud. Relevant information may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Insurance policy information relevant to the insurance fraud under investigation, including, but not limited to, any application for a policy.

(2) Policy premium payment records which are available.

(3) History of previous claims made by the insured.

(4) Information relating to the investigation of the insurance fraud, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and notice of loss.

(5) Complete copies of both sides of payment drafts.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not operate to authorize disclosure of medical information not otherwise authorized for disclosure pursuant to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 843, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.1.

Any information acquired pursuant to this article shall not be a part of any public record. Except as otherwise provided by law, any authorized governmental agency, an insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, which receives any information furnished pursuant to this article, shall not release that information to public inspection until the time that its release is required in connection with a criminal or civil proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.2.

In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurer, or any employee or agent authorized by an insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, and no authorized governmental agency or its respective employees, shall be subject to any civil liability for libel, slander, or any other relevant cause of action by virtue of releasing or receiving any information pursuant to Section 1873 or 1873.1. Nothing in this article is intended to, nor does in any way or manner, abrogate or lessen the existing common law or statutory privileges and immunities of an insurer, or any employee or agent authorized by the insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, or of any authorized governmental agency or its respective employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.3.

(a) For purposes of this article and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1872), “insurance fraud” does not include motor vehicle theft and motor vehicle insurance fraud reporting subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1874), or workers’ compensation insurance fraud reporting subject to Article 7 (commencing with Section 1877). 

(b) As used in this article, “authorized governmental agency” means the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Justice, the police department of a city, or a city and county, the sheriff’s office or department of a county, the district attorney of any county, or city and county, those agencies employing officers designated in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.1, subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, and subdivisions (b), (d), and (k) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code, any other law enforcement agency of this state or any city or county, or city and county, and any licensing agency governed by the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.4.

Any or all information released or received by an authorized governmental entity pursuant to Section 1873 or 1873.1 shall be provided by that agency to the Fraud Division within 10 days of the agency’s receipt of the information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 717, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Motor Vehicle Theft and Motor Vehicle Insurance Fraud Reporting [1874. - 1874.8.]

1874.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Theft and Motor Vehicle Insurance Fraud Reporting Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.1.

The following definitions govern the construction of this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Authorized governmental agency” means the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Justice, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the police department of a city, or a city and county, the sheriff’s office or department of a county, a law enforcement agency of the federal government, the district attorney of any county, or city and county, and any licensing agency governed by the Business and Professions Code or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(b) “Relevant” means having a tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the investigation or determination of an issue more probable or less probable than it would be without the information.

(c) Information shall be deemed important if, within the sole discretion of the authorized governmental agency, that information is requested by that authorized governmental agency.

(d) “Insurer” means the automobile assigned risk plan established pursuant to Section 11620 of the Insurance Code, as well as any insurer writing insurance for motor vehicles or otherwise liable for any loss due to motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud.

(e) “Motor vehicle” means motor vehicle as defined in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.2.

(a) Upon written request to an insurer by an authorized governmental agency, an insurer or agent authorized by that insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, shall release to the requesting authorized governmental agency any or all relevant information deemed important to the authorized governmental agency that the insurer may possess relating to any specific motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud. Relevant information may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Insurance policy information relevant to the motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud under investigation, including, but not limited to, any application for a policy.

(2) Policy premium payment records that are available.

(3) History of previous claims made by the insured.

(4) Information relating to the investigation of the motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and notice of loss.

(b) (1) When an insurer knows or reasonably believes it knows the identity of a person whom it has reason to believe committed a criminal or fraudulent act relating to a motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance claim or has knowledge of the criminal or fraudulent act that is reasonably believed not to have been reported to an authorized governmental agency, then, for the purpose of notification and investigation, the insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, shall notify the local police department, sheriff’s office, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or district attorney’s office, and may notify any other authorized governmental agency of that knowledge or reasonable belief and provide any additional information in accordance with subdivision (a).

(2) When an insurer provides the local police department, sheriff’s office, Department of the California Highway Patrol, or district attorney’s office with notice pursuant to this section, it shall be deemed sufficient notice to all authorized governmental agencies for the purpose of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall relieve an insurer of its obligations under Section 1872.4.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall abrogate or impair the rights or powers created under subdivision (a).

(c) The authorized governmental agency provided with information pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may release or provide that information to any other authorized governmental agency.

(d) An authorized governmental agency shall notify the affected insurer in writing when it has reason to believe that a fraudulent act relating to a motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance claim has been committed. The agency shall provide this notice within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 days. The agency may also release more specific information pursuant to this section when it determines that an ongoing investigation would not be jeopardized. The agency may require a fee from the insurer equal to the cost of providing the notice or the information specified in this section.

(e) An insurer providing information to an authorized agency pursuant to this section shall provide the information within a reasonable time, but not to exceed 30 days from the day on which the duty arose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 461.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.3.

(a) Any information acquired pursuant to this article shall not be a part of any public record. Except as otherwise provided by law, any authorized governmental agency, an insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, which receives any information furnished pursuant to this article shall not release that information to public inspection.

(b) The evidence or information described in this section shall be privileged and shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum in a civil or criminal proceeding unless, after reasonable notice to any insurer, agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, and an authorized governmental agency which has an interest in the information, and a hearing, the court determines that the public interest and any ongoing investigation by the authorized governmental agency, insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf will not be jeopardized by its disclosure, or by the issuance of and compliance with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.4.

In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurer, or agent authorized by an insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, and no authorized governmental agency or its employees, shall be subject to any civil liability in a cause of action of any kind for releasing or receiving any information pursuant to Section 1874.1 or 1874.2. Nothing in this chapter is intended to, nor does in any way or manner, abrogate or lessen the existing common law or statutory privileges and immunities of an insurer, agent authorized by that insurer to act on behalf of the insurer, or of any authorized governmental agency or its employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.6.

Every insurer shall report covered private passenger automobiles involved in theft and salvage total losses, including the vehicle identification number and any other information as may be required, to the National Automobile Theft Bureau or a similar central organization engaged in automobile loss prevention approved by the commissioner, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

Prior to the payment of total theft losses, insurers shall comply with verification procedures in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

No insurer, the National Automobile Theft Bureau, or a similar central organization, engaged in automobile loss prevention approved by the commissioner, or their employees or agents, shall be liable for damages in a civil action when the insurer or person acts pursuant to this section in good faith, without malice, and in reasonable belief that the action taken is warranted by the known facts after a reasonable effort to obtain the facts.

As used in this section “private passenger automobile” a motor vehicle of the private passenger or station wagon type, any other four-wheel vehicle with a load capacity of 1,500 pounds or less, or a motorcycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 948, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.8.

(a) Each insurer doing business in this state shall pay an annual special purpose assessment to be determined by the commissioner in an amount not to exceed fifty cents ($0.50) for each vehicle insured under an insurance policy it issues in this state, in order to fund the Fraud Division and the Organized Automobile Fraud Activity Interdiction Program.

(b) (1) From the funds to be distributed to district attorneys under this section, the commissioner shall fund between three and 10 grants at any one time for a coordinated program targeted at the successful prosecution and elimination of organized automobile fraud activity. These grants may be awarded only to district attorneys.

(2) In determining whether to award a district attorney a grant pursuant to this subdivision, the commissioner shall consider factors indicating organized automobile fraud activity in the district attorney’s county, including, but not limited to, the county’s level of general criminal activity, population density, automobile insurance claims frequency, number of suspected fraudulent claims, and prior and current evidence of organized automobile fraud activity. Funding priority shall be given to those grant applications with the potential to have the greatest impact on reducing organized automobile insurance fraud activity committed by an insurer’s employees or agents, brokers, insureds, and others, and lessening the economic losses realized by insurers from that fraud.

(3) All
 participants of a grant under this subdivision shall coordinate their efforts and work in conjunction with the Fraud Division, other participating agencies, and all interested insurers in this regard.

(c) Of the funds collected pursuant to this section, upon appropriation by the Legislature, 42.5 percent shall be distributed to district attorneys, 42.5 percent shall be distributed to the Fraud Division, and 15 percent shall be distributed to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. Funds distributed pursuant to this section to the Fraud Division and to the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall be used to fund Fraud Division and Department of the California Highway Patrol investigators to work in conjunction with district attorneys who are awarded grants. Each grantee shall be notified by the Fraud Division of the identity of
 the investigators assigned to work with the grantee. In accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable grant, each grantee shall provide the Fraud Division with information resulting from the investigations the grantee conducts pursuant to this section. This section does not prohibit the referral of any cases developed by the Fraud Division to any appropriate prosecutorial entity.

(d) A grant under this section shall be awarded on the basis of a single application for a period of three years and shall be subject where applicable to the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1872.8, except for the requirement that grants be awarded according to population. Continued funding of a grant shall be contingent upon a grantee’s successful performance, as determined by an annual review by the commissioner. Any redirection of
 grant funds under this section shall be made only for good cause. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall submit to the commissioner, for informational purposes only, an annual report on its expenditure of funds under this section in the same format as is required of grantees under this section.

(e) Two or more district attorneys may submit a joint application for a grant award under this section.

(f) The Fraud Division shall report to the Governor, the Legislature, and to the committees of the Senate and Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance on the results of the grant program established by this section, including funding distributed to the Department of the California Highway Patrol in the annual report submitted pursuant to Section 12922.

(g) For purposes of this section, “organized automobile fraud activity” means two or more persons who conspire, aid and abet, or in any other manner act together, to engage in economic automobile theft as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1872.8, or to violate any of the following sections in a manner that involved an automobile insurance claim:

(1) Section 650 or 6152 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) Section 750.

(3) Section 549, 550, or 551 of the Penal Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 347, Sec. 5.   (SB 476)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Insurer Inspections [1874.85. - 1874.87.]

1874.85.

An insurer that issues automobile liability or collision policies shall inspect vehicles for which it has approved a claim for the cost of auto body repairs, either during the repair process or after the work has been completed, and the number of vehicles inspected shall be a statistical sampling sufficient to demonstrate to the department the insurer’s efforts to reduce fraudulent auto body work during a calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.86.

Each insurer subject to this article shall report, at the request of the commissioner, but not more than annually, to the department on the following:

(a) The number of vehicles inspected pursuant to Section 1874.85 and the percentage that this number represents of the total number of vehicles for which it paid a claim for the cost of auto body repairs in the prior calendar year.

(b) The results of the inspections, including the nature of any fraud uncovered, and whether or not legal action was pursued.

The department shall make the information provided pursuant to this
 section available to the California Highway Patrol and the Bureau of Automotive Repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 27.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.87.

(a) Each insurer subject to this article shall provide each insured with an Auto Body Repair Consumer Bill of Rights either at the time of application for an automobile insurance policy or following an accident that is reported to the insurer. If the insurer provides the insured with an electronic copy of a policy, the bill of rights may also be transmitted electronically.

(b) The bill of rights shall be a standardized form developed by the department with the purpose of presenting easy-to-read facts for auto insurance consumers. The content of the bill of rights shall be determined by the department, and at a minimum, shall contain information about all of the following:

(1) A consumer’s right to select an auto body repair shop for auto body damage covered by the
 insurance policy and that an insurer may not require this work to be done at a particular auto body repair shop.

(2) The consumer’s right to be informed about auto body repairs made with new original equipment crash parts, new aftermarket crash parts, and used crash parts.

(3) The consumer’s right to be informed about coverage for towing services, and for a replacement rental vehicle while a damaged vehicle is being repaired.

(4) Toll-free telephone numbers and Internet addresses for reporting suspected fraud or other complaints and concerns about auto body repair shops to the Bureau of Automotive Repair.

(5) A consumer’s right to seek and obtain an independent repair estimate directly from a registered auto
 body repair shop for repair of a damaged vehicle, even when pursuing an insurance claim for repair of that vehicle.

(c) The department shall consult with the Bureau of Automotive Repair in determining the information to be contained in the bill of rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   (AB 1179)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. Auto Insurance Fraud Crisis Areas [1874.90. - 1874.90.]

1874.90.

The commissioner may declare any region of the state as an auto insurance fraud crisis area upon making a finding that auto insurance fraud is endemic to the area. That declaration of an auto insurance fraud crisis area shall be in effect for not more than two years, unless extended or renewed by the commissioner. Auto insurance fraud is endemic to an area if the commissioner determines that organized automobile fraud activity exists in the area and contributes significantly to the cost of automobile insurance in that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Arson Investigations [1875. - 1875.8.]

1875.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Authorized agency” means any of the following officers or agencies, or their duly authorized representatives, when investigating or prosecuting arson in connection with a specific fire: the State Fire Marshal, the Director of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the chief of any city or county fire department, the chief of any fire protection district, the Attorney General, any district attorney, or any peace officer, the Department of Insurance, and any federal agency. 

(b) “Insurer” means any insurer admitted to write, or otherwise issuing, fire insurance covering property in this state and includes its agents, servants, investigators, and adjusters. “Insurer” includes the California FAIR Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.1.

An authorized agency may, when there is evidence or suspicion that the crime of arson has been committed, request any insurer to release all information in its possession that the authorized agency determines to be relevant to the crime. The insurer shall release the following:

(a) Any insurance policy or any application for such a policy.

(b) Policy premium payment records.

(c) History of previous claims made by the insured for fire loss.

(d) Material relating to the investigation of the loss, including the statement of any person, proof of loss, and any other relevant evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.2.

If any insurer has reason to suspect that a fire loss was caused by incendiary means, the insurer shall furnish an authorized agency with all relevant information acquired during its investigation of the fire loss and cooperate in an investigation by an authorized agency.

The authorized agency provided with the information pursuant to this article may release that information to any of the other authorized agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.3.

An authorized agency shall notify the insurer, if known, and at the expense of the insurer, whenever it has reason to believe that a fire loss was not accidentally caused. The agency shall also release to the claimant’s insurer specific information regarding the fire loss at the earliest time possible unless it determines that an ongoing investigation would be jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.4.

In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurer or person acting in its behalf who (a) furnishes information whether oral or written, pursuant to this article, or (b) assists in any investigation conducted by an authorized agency, shall be liable for damages in a civil action, nor shall any authorized agency which releases information pursuant to this chapter be liable for damages in a civil action.

The act of furnishing information required pursuant to this article shall not constitute an act of fraud or malice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.5.

In any case in which an insurer willfully fails to comply with this article, the authorized agency may petition the superior court in an appropriate county for an order requiring compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.6.

Any authorized agency that receives any information furnished as required by this article shall not make the information public until the time that its release is required in connection with a criminal or civil proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.8.
